Utah statutes.
57-24-101.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1) (a)  "Flag" means a depiction or emblem:

(i) (A)  of the flag of the United States as provided in United States Code Title 4, Chapter 1, The Flag; or

(B)  of the state flag of Utah as provided in Section 63G-1-501;

(ii)  made from fabric or cloth; and

(iii)  with measurements that do not exceed three feet by five feet.

(b)  "Flag" does not include a depiction or emblem made from:

(i)  lights;

(ii)  paint;

(iii)  roofing;

(iv)  siding;

(v)  paving materials;

(vi)  flora;

(vii)  balloons; or

(viii)  any other building, landscaping, or decorative component.

(2)  "Resident" means:

(a)  a renter as defined in Section 57-22-2;

(b)  a resident as defined in Section 57-16-3; or

(c)  a unit owner as defined in Section 57-8-3.

(3)  "Residential property management authority" means:

(a)  an owner as defined in Section 57-22-2;

(b)  a mobile home park as defined in Section 57-16-3;

(c)  a mobile home park residents' association established in accordance with Section 57-16-16;

(d)  an association of unit owners as defined in Section 57-8-3; or

(e)  a management committee as defined in Section 57-8-3.

